Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.460

Contracts to lease building space and portable buildings and lease or have maintained security systems, computers and other equipment.

The board of any educational service district may enter into contracts for their respective districts for periods not exceeding twenty years in duration with public and private persons, organizations, and entities for the following purposes:

(1) To rent or lease building space, portable buildings, security systems, computers and other equipment; and

(2) To have maintained and repaired security systems, computers and other equipment.

The budget of each educational service district shall identify that portion of each contractual liability incurred pursuant to this section extending beyond the fiscal year by amount, duration, and nature of the contracted service and/or item in accordance with rules and regulations of the superintendent of public instruction adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.310.330 and 28A.505.140.

[ 1990 c 33 s 291; 1987 c 508 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 210 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.21.310.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 210: See note following RCW 28A.335.170.